src/verb-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===== !
! Verbs !
! ===== !

! ToC
! ---

! Negative verbs
! Copula
! Stray forms+
! Main verbs

! -------------- !
! Negative verbs !
! -------------- !

LEXICON Negativeverb

ii+V+IV+Neg: negmood ;
ii+V+IV+Neg+Imprt+Pl1+Err/Sub:állot K ;

LEXICON negmood
+Ind: negind ;
+Imprt: negimp ;
+Sup: negsup ;

LEXICON negind
+Sg1:i%>n K-default ;
+Sg2:i%>t K-default ;
+Sg3:i%>i K-default ;
+Du1:ea%>n K-default ;
+Du2+Err/Sub:eahkki%> K-default ; ! !Polmak dialect
+Du2:eahppi%> K-default ;
+Du3:eaba%> K-default ;
+Du3+Err/Sub:eava%> K-default ; ! !Kárášjohka dialect
+Pl1:ea%>t K-default ;
+Pl1+Err/Sub+Use/NG:ea%>p9 K-default ; ! !Skániid dialect
+Pl2:ehpe%>t K-default ;
+Pl3:ea%>i K-default ;

LEXICON negimp
+Sg1:allo%>n K-ge ;
+Sg2:ale%> K-ge ;
+Sg2+Err/Sub:ále%> K-ge ;
+Sg3:allo%>s K-ge ;
+Du1:al'lu%> K-ge ;
+Du2:al'li%> K-ge ;
+Du3:allo%>ska K-ge ;
+Pl1:allo%>t K-ge ;
+Pl1:allu%>t K-ge ;
+Pl2:alle%>t K-ge ;
+Pl3:allo%>set K-ge ;

LEXICON negsup
+Sg1:ama%>n ENDLEX ;
+Sg1+Err/Sub:amasan ENDLEX ;
+Sg2:ama%>t ENDLEX ;
+Sg2+Err/Sub:amasat ENDLEX ;
+Sg3:ama%>s ENDLEX ;
+Du1:ama%>me ENDLEX ;
+Du2:ama%>de ENDLEX ;
+Du3:ama%>ska ENDLEX ;
+Pl1:ama%>met ENDLEX ;
+Pl2:ama%>det ENDLEX ;
+Pl3:ama%>set ENDLEX ;

! ------ !
! Copula !
! ------ !

LEXICON Copula ! Dividing into finite and infinite
leat+V+IV:l Finitecop ;
leat+V+IV:l Infinitecop ;
leat+V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Sub:leamas K ;
leat+V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Sub:leahkán K ;

LEXICON Finitecop ! Removed %>, they blocked diphtsim^pl
+Ind+Prs: Prscop ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>eat K ;
+Ind+Prt: Prtcop ;
+Cond+Prs:ivčče%> CondC ; ! regular cond, pointer to 3syll paradigm
+Cond+Prs+Err/Sub:ivččo%> PrtV ;  ! alternate cond, pointer to 2syll par !
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Sub:ivččo%> K ;  ! 
+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Sub+Use/NG:ivčče%> K ; ! special cond for Sg3 !
+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eaš K ;    !  all Pot pointers copied from sme-lex
+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eš K ; 
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eaš K ; ! 
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eš K ; 
+Pot+Prs:eažža%> PotPrsV ;
+Pot+Prt:eažža%> PrtV ;
+Imprt: Impcop ;
+ConNeg:eage%> K ;
+ConNegII:ehko%> K ;

! The boundary marks in the following 4 lexica were removed, as result of
! the discussion.
LEXICON Prscop
+Sg1:%>ean K ;
+Sg2:%>eat K ;
+Sg3:%>ea K ;
+Du1:etne%> K ;
+Du1+Use/NG:edne%> K ; ! 
+Du2:eahppi%> K ;
+Du3:eaba%> K ;
+Pl1:%>eat K ;
+Pl2:ehpe%>t K ;
+Pl3:%>eat K ;

LEXICON Prtcop
+Sg1:edje%>n K ;
+Sg2:edje%>t K ;
+Sg3:%>ej K ;
+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eaj K ; ! 
+Du1:ejmme%> K ;
+Du2:ejdde%> K ;
+Du3:ejgga%> K ;
+Du3+Use/NG:eajgga%> K ; ! 
+Pl1:ejmme%>t K ;
+Pl2:ejdde%>t K ;
+Pl3:edje%> K ;

LEXICON Impcop
+Sg1:ehko%>n K ;
+Sg2:eage%> K ;
+Sg3:ehko%>s K ;
!+Sg3:%>eaj K ; !This is not right
+Du1+Dial/%-KJ:eadnu%> K ; ! 
+Du1+Dial/%-GG:eahkku%> K ;	! 
+Du2:eahkki%> K ;
+Du3:ehko%>ska K ;
+Pl1+Dial/%-GG:ehko%>t K ;	! 
+Pl1+Dial/%-KJ:eatno%>t K ; ! 
+Pl2:ehke%>t K ;
+Pl3:ehko%>set K ;

LEXICON Infinitecop
+Inf+Use/NG:eahki%>t K ; ! 
+Inf+Err/Sub:eahke%>t K ; !
+Inf:%>eat K ;
+Actio:eahki%>n K ;
+Actio+Ess+Dial/%-GG:eame%>n K ;	! 
+Actio+Ess+Dial/%-KJ:eame%> K ;		! 
+Actio+Ess+Err/Sub:eami%>n K ;		! 
+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:eahki%>me K ;		! 
+Actio+Loc:eame%>s K ;
+PrsPrc:eahkki K ; !  FMT: CHECK THIS 
!+PrfPrc+Use/NG:%>ean K ; ! 
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>ean K ; ! 
+PrfPrc:eama%>š K ;
+PrfPrc+Use/NG:eama%>šan K ; ! 

! ----------- !
! Stray forms !
! ----------- !

LEXICON STRAYFORMS

sorjankeahttá+V+IV+Abess:sorjan%>keahttá ENDLEX ; ! Abess without verb.

! These forms added for the dictionary:

huraidit+V+IV+VGen:hurat K ;
huraidit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:hurat K ;
huraidit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2:hurat K ;
háliidit+V+TV+VGen:hálit K ;
háliidit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:hálit K ;
háliidit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2:hálit K ;

LEXICON Eahpe_Verb
eahpebasuhit+CmpN/First:eahpe#basuh MUITAL_TV ;
eahpegudnejahttit+CmpN/First:eahpe#gudnejahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
eahpelihkostuvvat+CmpN/First:eahpe#lihkost UVVA_IV ;

! ---------- !
! Main verbs !
! ---------- !
